Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1815
Public entity; discretionary actions.

A public entity undertaking a mandated project is not required to pay or reimburse the costs of the mandated project with mandated project charges, and such public entity is not required to issue mandated project bonds. The use of mandated project charges and issuance of mandated project bonds are elective actions wholly within the discretion of the public entity.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 15.